Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.180

Increase of assessment for specific fruit or classification—Procedure.

(1) The same assessment shall be made for each soft tree fruit, except that if a two-thirds majority of the state commodity committee of any fruit recommends in writing the levy of an additional assessment on that fruit, or any classification thereof, for any year or years, the commission may levy such assessment for that year or years up to the maximum of eighteen dollars for each two thousand pounds of any fruit except cherries or any classification thereof, as to which the assessment may be increased to a maximum of thirty dollars for each two thousand pounds, and except pears covered by this chapter, as to which the assessment may be increased to a maximum of eighteen dollars for each two thousand pounds: PROVIDED, That no increase in the assessment on pears becomes effective unless the increase is first referred by the commission to a referendum by the Bartlett pear growers of the state and is approved by a majority of the growers voting on the referendum. The method and procedure of conducting the referendum shall be determined by the commission. Any funds so raised shall be expended solely for the purposes provided in this chapter and solely for such fruit, or classification thereof.

The commission has the authority in its discretion to exempt in whole or in part from future assessments under this chapter, during such period as the commission may prescribe, any of the soft tree fruits or any particular strain or classification of them.

(2) An assessment levied under this chapter may be increased in excess of the fiscal growth factor as determined under chapter 43.135 RCW if the assessment is submitted by referendum to the growers who are subject to the assessment and the increase is approved by a majority of those voting on the referendum. The method and procedure of conducting the referendum shall be determined by the commission.

[ 1997 c 303 s 3; 1992 c 87 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 8 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 43 s 1; 1963 c 51 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.180. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 26; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-35.]

NOTES:

Findings—1997 c 303: See note following RCW 43.135.055.

Effective date—1997 c 303 ss 1-3: See note following RCW 43.135.055.